Utah statutes.
49-11-307.    Report on funded status -- Study of compensation.
(1) (a)  The office shall report the funded status of the Utah State
Retirement Investment Fund to the Retirement and Independent Entities
Committee created under Section 63E-1-201.
(b)  The report under Subsection (1)(a) shall be made at least annually or as
requested by the committee.
(2) (a)  If the Utah State Retirement Investment Fund reaches a funded status
of 100%, the office shall make a report to that effect.
(b)  The report shall be provided to the governor, the board, the president of
the Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, and to each member
and staff of the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee created under
Section 63E-1-201.
(3)  Upon receipt of the report under Subsection (2)(b), the committee shall
conduct a study on participating employee compensation and benefits to
determine the need for adjustments in retirement benefits, salary, and other
benefits for the recruitment and retention of a qualified workforce.
(4)  The committee shall report any findings and recommendations to the
Legislative Management Committee.
